en: Ice Climbing Tools
xx: Ice Climbing Tools
cs: Výbava pro lezení na ledu
da: Isklatringredskaber
de: Eiskletterausrüstung
es: Herramientas para escalada en hielo
fr: Matériel pour l'escalade glacière
it: Attrezzi per arrampicata su ghiaccio
ja: アイスクライミング用品
nl: IJsklimmateriaal
no: Isklatreverktøy
pl: Sprzęt do wspinaczki lodowej
pt: Ferramentas de escalada no gelo
ru: Инструменты для ледолазания
sv: Verktyg för isklättring
tr: Buz Tırmanışı Aletleri

en: Ice Screws
xx: Ice Screws
cs: Šrouby do ledu
da: Isskruer
de: Eisschrauben
es: Tornillos para hielo
fr: Vis à glace
it: Viti da ghiaccio
ja: アイススクリュー
nl: IJsschroeven
no: Isskruer
pl: Śruby lodowe
pt: Parafusos de gelo
ru: Альпинистские ледобуры
sv: Isskruvar
tr: Buz Vidaları

en: Indoor Climbing Holds
xx: Indoor Climbing Holds
cs: Úchyty pro horolezecké stěny
da: Klatregreb til indendørs klatring
de: Kletterwandgriffe
es: Presas de escalada
fr: Prises d'escalade d'intérieur
it: Prese per arrampicata indoor
ja: インドアクライミング用ホールド
nl: Steunen voor indoorklimmen
no: Fester for innendørsklatring
pl: Chwyty wspinaczkowe
pt: Agarras de escalada indoor
ru: Зацепы для скалодрома
sv: Grepp för inomhusklättring
tr: Salon Tırmanış Tutacakları

en: Quickdraws
xx: Quickdraws
cs: Expresní smyčky
da: Ekspresslynge
de: Expresssets
es: Maillones
fr: Dégaines
it: Rinvii
ja: クイックドロー
nl: Klimhaken
no: Slynger
pl: Ekspresy
pt: Extensores para alpinismo
ru: Оттяжки
sv: Expresslingor
tr: Tırmanma Halatı Klipsleri

en: Cycling
xx: Cycling
cs: Cyklistika
da: Cykling
de: Radsport
es: Ciclismo
fr: Cyclisme
it: Ciclismo
ja: 自転車用品
nl: Fietsen (sport)
no: Sykling
pl: Jazda na rowerze
pt: Ciclismo
ru: Велоспорт
sv: Cykling
tr: Bisiklet

en: Bicycle Accessories
xx: Bicycle Accessories
cs: Jízdní kola – příslušenství
da: Cykeltilbehør
de: Fahrradzubehör
es: Accesorios para bicicletas
fr: Accessoires de cyclisme
it: Accessori per biciclette
ja: 自転車関連用品
nl: Fietsaccessoires
no: Sykkeltilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do rowerów
pt: Acessórios para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные принадлежности
sv: Cykeltillbehör
tr: Bisiklet Aksesuarları

en: Bicycle Bags & Panniers
xx: Bicycle Bags & Panniers
cs: Tašky a nosiče na kola
da: Cykeltasker og -kurve
de: Fahrradtaschen
es: Bolsas y maletas para bicicletas
fr: Sacoches pour vélo
it: Borse e zaini da bicicletta
ja: 自転車用荷物入れ
nl: Fietstassen
no: Sykkelvesker
pl: Sakwy i torby rowerowe
pt: Sacos e cestinhas para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные сумки
sv: Cykelväskor och packväskor
tr: Bisiklet Çantaları

en: Bicycle Baskets
xx: Bicycle Baskets
cs: Košíky na kola
da: Cykelkurve
de: Fahrradkörbe
es: Cestas para bicicletas
fr: Paniers de vélo
it: Cestini da bicicletta
ja: 自転車カゴ
nl: Fietsmandjes
no: Sykkelkurver
pl: Koszyki rowerowe
pt: Cestinhas para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные корзинки
sv: Cykelkorgar
tr: Bisiklet Sepetleri

en: Bicycle Bells & Horns
xx: Bicycle Bells & Horns
cs: Zvonky a klaksony na kola
da: Ringeklokker og horn
de: Fahrradklingeln & -hupen
es: Timbres y bocinas para bicicletas
fr: Sonnettes et klaxons de vélo
it: Campanelli e trombette bicicletta
ja: 自転車用ベル
nl: Fietsbellen en -toeters
no: Sykkelringeklokker og -horn
pl: Dzwonki i klaksony rowerowe
pt: Buzinas e campainhas para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные звонки и гудки
sv: Ringklockor och signalhorn
tr: Bisiklet Zilleri ve Kornaları

en: Bicycle Cages
xx: Bicycle Cages
cs: Košíky na lahve pro jízdní kola
da: Cykelvandflaskeholdere
de: Flaschenhalter für Fahrradrahmen
es: Portabidones para bicicletas
fr: Portebidons
it: Gabbie portabiciclette
ja: 自転車用ケージ
nl: Fietskooien
no: Flaskeholdere
pl: Koszyki na bidony
pt: Gaiolas para bicicletas
ru: Клетки для велосипедов
sv: Flaskhållare för cyklar
tr: Bisiklet Park Etme Kafesleri

en: Bicycle Child Seat Accessories
xx: Bicycle Child Seat Accessories
cs: Příslušenství pro dětské sedačky na kola
da: Tilbehør til cykelbarnesæder
de: Zubehör für Fahrradkindersitze
es: Accesorios para asientos de bicicleta infantiles
fr: Accessoires pour sièges enfants pour vélo
it: Accessori per seggiolini per bambini per biciclette
ja: 自転車用チャイルド シート向けアクセサリー
nl: Accessoires voor fietsstoeltjes voor kinderen
no: Tilbehør til barneseter for sykkel
pl: Akcesoria do krzesełek rowerowych dla dzieci
pt: Acessórios para assentos de crianças para bicicletas
ru: Запчасти и приспособления для детских велосипедных кресел
sv: Cykelbarnstol
tr: Bisiklet Çocuk Koltuğu Aksesuarları

en: Bicycle Child Seats
xx: Bicycle Child Seats
cs: Dětská sedátka na kolo
da: Cykelsæder
de: Kinderfahrradsitze
es: Asientos para llevar niños en bicicleta
fr: Sièges de vélo pour enfants, Porte-bébé pour vélo
it: Seggiolini da bicicletta per bambini
ja: 自転車用チャイルドシート
nl: Fietsstoeltjes voor kinderen
no: Barneseter til sykkel
pl: Foteliki rowerowe
pt: Assentos de bicicletas para crianças
ru: Детские сиденья для велосипедов
sv: Barnstolar för cyklar
tr: Bisiklet Çocuk Koltukları

en: Bicycle Computer Accessories
xx: Bicycle Computer Accessories
cs: Cyklopočítače – příslušenství
da: Cykelcomputere – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Fahrradcomputer
es: Accesorios de ordenadores para bicicleta
fr: Accessoires de cyclomètres
it: Accessori computer per biciclette
ja: サイクルコンピューター関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor fietscomputers
no: Tilbehør til sykkeldatamaskiner
pl: Akcesoria elektroniczne do rowerów
pt: Acessórios para computador de bicicleta
ru: Принадлежности для велокомпьютеров
sv: Tillbehör till cykeldatorer
tr: Bisiklet Bilgisayarı Aksesuarları

en: Bicycle Computers
xx: Bicycle Computers
cs: Cyklopočítače
da: Cykelcomputere
de: Fahrradcomputer
es: Ordenadores para bicicletas
fr: Cyclomètres
it: Computer per biciclette
ja: サイクルコンピューター
nl: Fietscomputers
no: Sykkeldatamaskiner
pl: Liczniki rowerowe
pt: Computadores para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные компьютеры
sv: Cykeldatorer
tr: Bisiklet Bilgisayarları

en: Bicycle Covers
xx: Bicycle Covers
cs: Obaly na kolo
da: Cykeldækkener
de: Fahrradabdeckungen
es: Fundas para bicicletas
fr: Housses de vélo
it: Teli per biciclette
ja: 自転車カバー
nl: Fietshoezen
no: Sykkeltrekk
pl: Pokrowce na rowery
pt: Capas para bicicletas
ru: Чехлы для велосипедов
sv: Cykelöverdrag
tr: Bisiklet Kılıfları

en: Bicycle Fenders
xx: Bicycle Fenders
cs: Blatníky na kola
da: Cykelskærme
de: Fahrradschutzbleche
es: Guardabarros para bicicletas
fr: Garde-boue de vélo
it: Parafanghi per biciclette
ja: 自転車泥よけ
nl: Fietsspatborden
no: Sykkelskjermer
pl: Błotniki rowerowe
pt: Para-lamas para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные крылья
sv: Cykelstänkskärmar
tr: Bisiklet Çamurlukları

en: Bicycle Front & Rear Racks
xx: Bicycle Front & Rear Racks
cs: Přední a zadní nosiče na kola
da: Cykelbagagebærere
de: Fahrradgepäckträger
es: Portaequipajes delanteros y traseros para bicicletas
fr: Porte-bagages de vélo
it: Portapacchi anteriori/posteriori bici
ja: 自転車荷台
nl: Fietsenrekken (voor en achter)
no: Sykkelbagasjebrett foran og bak
pl: Bagażniki rowerowe
pt: Suportes dianteiros e traseiros para bicicletas
ru: Передние и задные велосипедные стойки
sv: Främre och bakre cykeldrev
tr: Bisiklet Ön ve Arka Oturakları

en: Bicycle Handlebar Grips & Decor
xx: Bicycle Handlebar Grips & Decor
cs: Gripy a ozdoby na řidítka
da: Cykelstyrstilpasning og -dekoration
de: Griffe und Dekor für Fahrradlenker
es: Accesorios decorativos y puños de manillar para bicicletas
fr: Poignées et décorations pour guidons de vélo, Poignée de vélo
it: Maniglie ed elementi decorativi per manubri di biciclette
ja: 自転車ハンドルバー グリップ、自転車ハンドルバー装飾品
nl: Stuurgrepen en -decoratie voor fietsen
no: Sykkelhåndtak og -dekor
pl: Uchwyty i elementy dekoracyjne do kierownic rowerowych
pt: Punhos e decoração para guidão de bicicleta
ru: Ручки и украшения для велосипедного руля
sv: Cykelhandtag och dekor
tr: Bisiklet Gidonu Tutacakları ve Süslemeleri

en: Bicycle Locks
xx: Bicycle Locks
cs: Zámky na kola
da: Cykellåse
de: Fahrradschlösser
es: Candados para bicicletas
fr: Antivols pour vélos
it: Lucchetti per bici
ja: 自転車用ロック
nl: Fietssloten
no: Sykkellåser
pl: Zapięcia rowerowe
pt: Cadeados para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные замки
sv: Cykellås
tr: Bisiklet Kilitleri

en: Bicycle Mirrors
xx: Bicycle Mirrors
cs: Zrcátka na kola
da: Cykelspejle
de: Fahrradspiegel
es: Espejos para bicicletas
fr: Rétroviseurs vélo
it: Specchietti per bicicletta
ja: 自転車用ミラー
nl: Fietsspiegels
no: Sykkelspeil
pl: Lusterka rowerowe
pt: Retrovisores para bicicletas
ru: Велосипедные зеркала
sv: Cykelspeglar
tr: Bisiklet Aynaları